fst/karelian.lexd
PATTERNS
NounRootNoGrad NounInfl
NounRootKK NounInfl
NounRootP NounInfl
NounRootK0 NounInfl
NounRootK0A NounInfl
VerbRootUA VerbInflUA
VerbRootO VerbInflO
VerbRootYA VerbInflYA
VerbRootOE VerbInflOE

LEXICON NounRootNoGrad
Ahava:Ahava
ahava:ahava
ahinko:ahinko
ahjo:ahjo
ahku:ahku
ahmo:ahmo
aho:aho
ahvenapaja:ahvenapaja
ahvenheinä:ahvenheinä
ahvenmaima:ahvenmaima
airo:airo
aisa:aisa
ajatušviiva:ajatušviiva
ajo:ajo
ajomakšu:ajomakšu
akana:akana
ala:ala
ala-airo:ala-airo
alakuu:alakuu
alanko:alanko
alkueläjä:alkueläjä
alkušana:alkušana
alušpuu:alušpuu
ammattikoulu:ammattikoulu
ampujaispešä:ampujaispešä
ankervo:ankervo
antipala:antipala
anša:anša
apaja:apaja
apara:apara
apie:apie
apina:apina
apukirja:apukirja
apukoulu:apukoulu
arkipäivä:arkipäivä
armo:armo
arvo:arvo
arššina:arššina
asie:asie
ativo:ativo

LEXICON NounRootKK
ajelupualikka:ajelupuali{GK}a
akka:a{GK}a
balalaikka:balalai{GK}a
botanikka:botani{GK}a
elinpaikka:elinpai{GK}a
elukka:elu{GK}a
harakka:hara{GK}a
hatakka:hata{GK}a
haukka:hau{GK}a
hepokka:hepo{GK}a
hernehrokka:hernehro{GK}a
hiirihaukka:hiirihau{GK}a
hukka:hu{GK}a
kelkka:kel{GK}a
nurkka:nur{GK}a
paikka:pai{GK}a
tuurikka:tuuri{GK}a
vakka:va{GK}a
vesikelkka:vesikel{GK}a
čakka:ča{GK}a
česnokka:česno{GK}a
čirkka:čir{GK}a
čirkkapualikka:čirkkapuali{GK}a
čokka:čo{GK}a
čuhunnikka:čuhunni{GK}a
čäijylusikka:čäijylusi{GK}a
šukka:šu{GK}a

LEXICON NounRootP
arpa:ar{GP}a
huapa:hua{GP}a
hulpa:hul{GP}a

LEXICON NounRootK0
alku:al{GD}u
haukku:hauk{GD}u
henätukku:henätuk{GD}u
herkku:herk{GD}u
hiilikoukku:hiilikouk{GD}u
tukku:tuk{GD}u
čirkku:čirk{GD}u

LEXICON NounRootK0A
huahka:huah{GD}a

LEXICON NounInfl
<n><nom><sg>:
<n><gen><sg>:n

LEXICON VerbRootUA
ahistua:ahist
ahkua:ahk
ahnuštua:ahnušt
ahtua:aht
aihurtua:aihurt
ailaštua:ailašt
ajattua:ajatt
ajottua:ajott
ajua:aj
alentua:alent
alkua:alk
alottua:alott
ammultua:ammult
anaštua:anašt
andua:and
antua:ant
apattua:apatt
appua:app
armahtua:armaht
armaštua:armašt
arvottua:arvott
arvoštua:arvošt
auttua:autt
ašettua:ašett
ehottua:ehott
einuštua:einušt
eloistua:eloist
erottua:erott
hahattua:hahatt
haihattua:haihatt
hairahtua:hairaht
hapattua:hapatt
harhattua:harhatt
harmittua:harmitt
harventua:harvent
haukuttua:haukutt
hačattua:hačatt
heilahuttua:heilahutt
heiluttua:heilutt
helpottua:helpott

LEXICON VerbRootO
ahistautuo:ahistautu
akottuo:akottu
ammuo:ammu
ampuo:ampu
apeutuo:apeutu
arkeutuo:arkeutu
avautuo:avautu
ašettuo:ašettu
aštuo:aštu
haihtuo:haihtu
haisuo:haisu
hakoutuo:hakoutu
halvautuo:halvautu
hankautuo:hankautu
hapristuo:hapristu
harjautuo:harjautu
harmautuo:harmautu
haukkuo:haukku
havaččeutuo:havaččeutu
heiluo:heilu
hermoštuo:hermoštu
hieroutuo:hieroutu
hiiskuo:hiisku
hirnuo:hirnu
homehtuo:homehtu
hualistuo:hualistu
huamistuo:huamistu
humaltuo:humaltu
huojuo:huoju
ihaštuo:ihaštu
illaistuo:illaistu
irtautuo:irtautu
istuo:istu
istuutuo:istuutu
jakšautuo:jakšautu
janoštuo:janoštu
jatkuo:jatku
joikuo:joiku
joutuo:joutu
juopuo:juopu

LEXICON VerbRootYA
ehättyä:ehätt
eistyä:eist
ekšyttyä:ekšytt
eleyttyä:eleytt
elyä:el
ennättyä:ennätt
estettyä:estett
eväštyä:eväšt
eštyä:ešt
heittyä:heitt
helähtyä:heläht
henkittyä:henkitt
henkähtyä:henkäht
hiertyä:hiert
hihittyä:hihitt
hiihtyä:hiiht
hillentyä:hillent
hirvittyä:hirvitt
hyrähtyä:hyräht
hytkähtyä:hytkäht
hyvittyä:hyvitt
hämmentyä:hämment
hännittyä:hännitt
hävittyä:hävitt
höpertyä:höpert
ijättyä:ijätt
imettyä:imett
inttyä:intt
irvistyä:irvist
ityä:it
iäntyä:iänt
jyštyä:jyšt
järittyä:järitt
jättyä:jätt
kehittyä:kehitt
keittyä:keitt
kenkittyä:kenkitt
kerittyä:keritt
keventyä:kevent
keškeyttyä:keškeytt

LEXICON VerbRootOE
eistyö:eisty
ekšyö:ekšy
eleytyö:eleyty
erehtyö:erehty
heinäytyö:heinäyty
heittäytyö:heittäyty
henkäštyö:henkäšty
hieštyö:hiešty
hiileytyö:hiileyty
hiveltyö:hivelty
hiätyö:hiäty
hyötyö:hyöty
häilyö:häily
häipyö:häipy
hämmäštyö:hämmäšty
hämärtyö:hämärty
hätäytyö:hätäyty
höpertyö:höperty
ikävyštyö:ikävyšty
ilmeštyö:ilmešty
imeltyö:imelty
irvistyö:irvisty
jiätyö:jiäty
jiäviytyö:jiäviyty
jähmettyö:jähmetty
jähtyö:jähty
kehittyö:kehitty
keräytyö:keräyty
keškeytyö:keškeyty
kieltäytyö:kieltäyty
kiertyö:kierty
kiihtyö:kiihty
kiiristyö:kiiristy
kiitteliytyö:kiitteliyty
kipeytyö:kipeyty
kipristyö:kipristy
kiänteliytyö:kiänteliyty
kiäntyö:kiänty
kiäriytyö:kiäriyty
kyheytyö:kyheyty

LEXICON VerbInflUA
<v><nfin>:ua
<v><prs><ind><pos><3><sg>:au

LEXICON VerbInflO
<v><nfin>:o
<v><prs><ind><pos><3><sg>:u

LEXICON VerbInflYA
<v><nfin>:yä
<v><prs><ind><pos><3><sg>:äy

LEXICON VerbInflOE
<v><nfin>:ö
<v><prs><ind><pos><3><sg>:y
